Virginia statutes. Title 23.1. Institutions of Higher Education; Other Educational and Cultural Institutions.
Chapter 24. Virginia Commonwealth University Health System Authority.

§ 23.1-2400.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Authority”
means the Virginia Commonwealth University Health System Authority.

“Board”
means the board of directors of the Authority.

“Bonds”
means bonds, notes, revenue certificates, lease participation certificates, or other evidences of indebtedness or deferred purchase financing arrangements.

“Chief executive officer”
means the chief executive officer of the Virginia Commonwealth University Health System Authority.

“Costs”
means (i) costs of (a) construction, reconstruction, renovation, site work, and acquisition of lands, structures, rights-of-way, franchises, easements, and other property rights and interests; (b) demolition, removal, or relocation of buildings or structures; (c) labor, materials, machinery, and all other kinds of equipment; (d) engineering and inspections; (e) financial, legal, and accounting services; (f) plans, specifications, studies, and surveys; (g) estimates of costs and of revenues; (h) feasibility studies; and (i) issuance of bonds, including printing, engraving, advertising, legal, and other similar expenses; (ii) financing charges; (iii) administrative expenses, including administrative expenses during the start-up of any project; (iv) credit enhancement and liquidity facility fees; (v) fees for interest rate caps, collars, swaps, or other financial derivative products; (vi) interest on bonds in connection with a project prior to and during construction or acquisition thereof and for a period not exceeding one year thereafter; (vii) provisions for working capital to be used in connection with any project; (viii) redemption premiums, obligations purchased to provide for the payment of bonds being refunded, and other costs necessary or incident to refunding of bonds; (ix) operating and maintenance reserve funds, debt reserve funds, and other reserves for the payment of principal and interest on bonds; (x) all other expenses necessary, desirable, or incidental to the operation of the Authority’s facilities or the construction, reconstruction, renovation, acquisition, or financing of projects, other facilities, or equipment appropriate for carrying out the purposes of this chapter and the placing of the same in operation; or (xi) the refunding of bonds.

“Hospital facilities”
means all property or rights in property, real and personal, tangible and intangible, including all facilities suitable for providing hospital and health care services and all structures, buildings, improvements, additions, extensions, replacements, appurtenances, lands, rights in land, furnishings, landscaping, approaches, roadways, and other related and supporting facilities owned, leased, operated, or used, in whole or in part, by Virginia Commonwealth University as part of, or in connection with, MCV Hospitals in the normal course of its operations as a teaching, research, and medical treatment facility.

“Hospital obligations”
means all debts or other obligations, contingent or certain, owing to any person or other entity on the transfer date, arising out of the operation of MCV Hospitals as a medical treatment facility or the financing or refinancing of hospital facilities and including all bonds and other debts for the purchase of goods and services, whether or not delivered, and obligations for the delivery of services, whether or not performed.

“Project”
means any health care, research, or educational facility or equipment necessary or convenient to or consistent with the purposes of the Authority, whether owned by the Authority, including hospitals; nursing homes; continuing care facilities; self-care facilities; wellness and health maintenance centers; medical office facilities; clinics; outpatient clinics; surgical centers; alcohol, substance abuse, and drug treatment centers; laboratories; sanitariums; hospices; facilities for the residence or care of the elderly, the handicapped, or the chronically ill; residential facilities for nurses, interns, and physicians; other kinds of facilities for the treatment of sick, disturbed, or infirm individuals, the prevention of disease, or maintenance of health; colleges, schools, or divisions offering undergraduate or graduate programs for the health professions and sciences and such other courses of study as may be appropriate, together with research, training, and teaching facilities; all necessary or desirable related and supporting facilities and equipment or equipment alone, including (i) parking, kitchen, laundry, laboratory, wellness, pharmaceutical, administrative, communications, computer, and recreational facilities; (ii) power plants and equipment; (iii) storage space; (iv) mobile medical facilities; (v) vehicles; (vi) air transport equipment; and (vii) other equipment necessary or desirable for the transportation of medical equipment, medical personnel, or patients; and all lands, buildings, improvements, approaches, and appurtenances necessary or desirable in connection with or incidental to any project.

“Transfer date”
means a date or dates agreed to by the board of visitors of Virginia Commonwealth University and the Authority for the transfer of employees to the Authority and for the transfer of hospital facilities, or any parts thereof, to and the assumption, directly or indirectly, of hospital obligations by the Authority, which dates for the various transfers and the various assumptions may be different, but in no event shall any date be later than June 30, 1997.

“University”
means Virginia Commonwealth University.

History.

1996, cc. 905, 1046, § 23-50.16:4; 2000, c. 720; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2401.
Authority established; powers, purposes, and duties.

The Virginia Commonwealth University Health System Authority is established as a public body corporate, public instrumentality, and political subdivision of the Commonwealth with such public and corporate powers as are set forth in this chapter.

The purpose of the Authority is to exercise public and essential governmental functions to provide for the health, welfare, convenience, knowledge, benefit, and prosperity of the residents of the Commonwealth and such other individuals who might be served by the Authority by delivering and supporting the delivery of medical care and related services to such residents and individuals, providing educational opportunities in the medical field and related disciplines, conducting and facilitating research in the medical field and related disciplines, and enhancing the delivery of health care and related services to the Commonwealth’s indigent population. The Authority may perform such public and essential government functions with the power and purpose to:

Provide health care, including indigent care, to protect and promote the health and welfare of the citizens of the Commonwealth;

Serve as a high-quality teaching hospital to provide and promote health care by educating medical and health sciences professionals, providing medical services not widely available in the Commonwealth, and treating patients of the type and on the scale necessary to facilitate medical research and attract physicians, faculty members, researchers, and other individuals necessary to maintain quality medical and health sciences education;

Facilitate and support the health education, research, and public service activities of the Health Sciences Schools of the University;

Serve as the principal teaching and training hospital for undergraduate and graduate students of the Health Sciences Schools of the University;

Provide a site for faculty members of the Health Sciences Schools of the University to conduct medical and biomedical research; and

Operate and manage general hospital and other health care facilities, engaging in specialized management and operational practices to remain economically viable, earning revenues necessary for operations, and participating in arrangements with public and private entities and other activities, taking into account changes that have occurred or may occur in the future in the provision of health care and related services.

The Authority shall operate, maintain, and expand, as appropriate, teaching hospitals and related facilities for the benefit of the Commonwealth and its citizens and such other individuals who might be served by the Authority.

History.

1996, cc. 905, 1046, §§ 23-50.16:2, 23-50.16:3; 2000, c. 720; 2016, c. 588.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Sovereign immunity. —

Nurse was entitled to sovereign immunity because her actions were essential to carrying out the express interest of the Commonwealth, the Virginia Commonwealth University Health System Authority (VCUSHA) controlled her job, and the act complained of involved the use of judgment and discretion; VCUSHA was created to provide high quality patient care, and the nurse’s job was essential to that purpose,even if she was treating a patient and was not employed in a teaching or research function. Pike v. Hagaman, 90 Va. Cir. 138, 2015 Va. Cir. LEXIS 23 (Richmond Mar. 31, 2015), aff'd,

292 Va. 209

, 787 S.E.2d 89, 2016 Va. LEXIS 65 (2016) (decided under prior law).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Sovereign immunity. —

Supreme Court likely would find VCU Health System Authority to be an arm of the Commonwealth and therefore entitled to absolute immunity. Even if the Court were not to agree, however, VCU Health System Authority also satisfies the criteria of a quasi-municipal corporation and therefore would be entitled to immunity for governmental functions. The Virginia Tort Claims Act exposes the Commonwealth, but not VCU Health System Authority, to limited liability for the negligent acts of its employees. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable James P. “Jimmie” Massie III, Member, Virginia House of Delegates, 17-005, 2017 Va. AG LEXIS 26 (12/7/17).

§ 23.1-2402.
Board of directors; membership; meetings; officers; employees.

The Authority shall be governed by a board of directors with a total of 21 members that consists of 19 appointed members and two ex officio members. The 19 appointed members shall consist of six nonlegislative citizen members to be appointed by the Governor, of whom two shall be physician-faculty members; five members to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Delegates, of whom two shall be physician-faculty members; three members to be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, of whom one shall be a physician-faculty member; and five nonlegislative citizen members of the board of visitors of the University to be appointed by the rector of the board of visitors of the University, all of whom shall be members of the board of visitors of the University at all times while serving on the board. The President of the University and the Vice-President for Health Sciences of the University, or the individual who holds such other title as subsequently may be established by the board of visitors of the University for the chief academic and administrative officer for the Health Sciences Schools of the University, shall serve ex officio with voting privileges.All appointed members except those who are members of the board of visitors of the University shall have demonstrated experience or expertise in business, health care management, or legal affairs.

The five appointed physician-faculty members shall be faculty members of the University with hospital privileges at MCV Hospitals at all times while serving on the board.

The Governor, the Speaker of the House of Delegates, and the Senate Committee on Rules shall appoint physician-faculty members after consideration of names from lists submitted by the faculty physicians of the School of Medicine of the University through the Vice-President for Health Sciences of the University. The list shall contain at least two names for each vacancy.

Members shall serve for terms of three years. Vacancies occurring other than by expiration of a term shall be filled for the unexpired term. No member shall serve for more than two consecutive three-year terms; however, a member appointed to serve an unexpired term is eligible to serve two consecutive three-year terms. Members who serve two consecutive three-year terms are eligible for reappointment one year after the expiration of their second term. All appointments are subject to confirmation by the General Assembly. Members shall continue to hold office until their successors have been appointed and confirmed. Ex officio members shall serve a term coincident with their term of office.

Neither the board members appointed from the board of visitors of the University nor the ex officio members shall vote on matters that require them to breach their fiduciary duties to the University or to the Authority.

Any member may be removed for malfeasance, misfeasance, incompetence, or gross neglect of duty by the individual or entity that appointed him or, if such appointing individual no longer holds the office creating the right of appointment, by the current holder of that office.

The president of the University shall serve as the chairman of the board. The board shall elect annually a vice-chairman from among its membership. The board shall also elect a secretary and treasurer and such assistant secretaries and assistant treasurers as the board may authorize for terms determined by the board, each of whom may or may not be a member of the board. The same individual may serve as both secretary and treasurer.

The board may appoint an executive committee and other standing or special committees and prescribe their duties and powers, and any executive committee may exercise all such powers and duties of the board under this chapter as the board may delegate.

The board may provide for the appointment, employment, term, compensation, and removal of officers, employees, and agents of the Authority, including engineers, consultants, lawyers, and accountants, as the board deems appropriate.

The board shall meet at least four times each year and may hold such special meetings as it deems appropriate.

The board may adopt, amend, and repeal such policies, regulations, procedures, and bylaws not contrary to law or inconsistent with this chapter as it deems expedient for its own governance and for the governance and management of the Authority.

A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum for meetings, and the board may act by a majority of those present at any meeting.

Legislative board members are entitled to such compensation as provided in § 30-19.12 and nonlegislative citizen board members are entitled to such compensation for the performance of their duties as provided in §

2.2-2813

. All members are entitled to reimbursement for all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in §§

2.2-2813

and

2.2-2825

. Funding for the costs of compensation and expenses of the members shall be provided by the Authority.

The provisions of the State and Local Government Conflict of Interests Act (§

2.2-3100

et seq.) shall apply to the members of the board and the employees of the Authority.

History.

1996, cc. 905, 1046, § 23-50.16:5; 1998, c. 449; 2000, c. 720; 2004, c. 1000; 2014, cc. 3, 456; 2016, c. 588.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Fire inspections of capital projects. —

The State Fire Marshal or his designee is not required to perform, without compensation, preoccupancy inspections of capital projects owned by the Virginia Commonwealth University Health System Authority. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. William C. Shelton, Director, Department of Housing and Community Development, 03-087, 2004 Va. AG LEXIS 35 (7/22/04).

The Fire Marshal or his designee is required to perform, without compensation, preoccupancy inspections of capital projects owned by Virginia Commonwealth University and leased under conventional lease to the Authority. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. William C. Shelton, Director, Department of Housing and Community Development, 03-087, 2004 Va. AG LEXIS 35 (7/22/04).

Sovereign immunity. —

Supreme Court likely would find VCU Health System Authority to be an arm of the Commonwealth and therefore entitled to absolute immunity. Even if the Court were not to agree, however, VCU Health System Authority also satisfies the criteria of a quasi-municipal corporation and therefore would be entitled to immunity for governmental functions. The Virginia Tort Claims Act exposes the Commonwealth, but not VCU Health System Authority, to limited liability for the negligent acts of its employees. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable James P. “Jimmie” Massie III, Member, Virginia House of Delegates, 17-005, 2017 Va. AG LEXIS 26 (12/7/17).

§ 23.1-2403.
Chief executive officer of the Authority.

The Authority shall be under the immediate supervision and direction of a chief executive officer, subject to the policies and direction established by the board. The chief executive officer shall be the individual who holds the title of Vice-President for Health Sciences of Virginia Commonwealth University, or such other title as subsequently may be established by the board of visitors of the University for the chief academic and administrative officer for the Health Sciences Schools of the University. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the selection and removal of the chief executive officer, and the conditions of appointment, including salary, shall be made jointly by the board and the board of visitors of the University at a joint meeting of the board and the board of visitors of the University upon a vote of a majority of the members of each board present and voting at the aforementioned joint meeting, acting separately in accordance with applicable provisions of law.

In the event that a majority of the members of each board do not agree upon the selection, removal, or conditions of appointment, including salary, of the chief executive officer as provided in subsection A, then each board shall appoint a committee of three members of its respective board to consider the matter upon which the boards disagree. The selection, removal, or conditions of appointment shall be made jointly by the two committees at a joint meeting of the committees upon a vote by a majority of the members of each committee present and voting at the joint meeting. In the event that a majority of the members of each committee agree upon the selection, removal, or conditions of appointment of the chief executive officer, then the decision shall be reported to the board and the board of visitors of the University, each of which shall be bound by the decision of the committees. In the event that a majority of the members of each committee do not agree on the selection, removal, or conditions of appointment of the chief executive officer within 30 days of the appointment of the committees by each board, then the president of the University shall decide upon the matter upon which the committees disagree. The president of the University shall report his decision to both boards, each of which shall be bound by the decision of the president.

The chief executive officer shall devote his full time to the performance of his official duties and shall not be engaged in any other profession or occupation.

The chief executive officer shall supervise and administer the operation of the Authority in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

History.

1996, cc. 905, 1046, § 23-50.16:7; 2000, c. 720; 2014, cc. 3, 456; 2016, c. 588.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Sovereign immunity. —

Supreme Court likely would find VCU Health System Authority to be an arm of the Commonwealth and therefore entitled to absolute immunity. Even if the Court were not to agree, however, VCU Health System Authority also satisfies the criteria of a quasi-municipal corporation and therefore would be entitled to immunity for governmental functions. The Virginia Tort Claims Act exposes the Commonwealth, but not VCU Health System Authority, to limited liability for the negligent acts of its employees. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable James P. “Jimmie” Massie III, Member, Virginia House of Delegates, 17-005, 2017 Va. AG LEXIS 26 (12/7/17).

§ 23.1-2404.
Powers of the Authority.

The Authority has all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter, including the power to:

Sue and be sued in its own name;

Have and alter an official seal;

Have perpetual duration and succession in its name;

Locate and maintain offices at such places as it may designate;

Make and execute contracts, guarantees, or any other instruments and agreements necessary or convenient for the exercise of its powers and functions, including contracts with hospitals or health care businesses to operate and manage any or all of the hospital facilities or operations, and incur liabilities and secure the obligations of any entity or individual;

Conduct or engage in any lawful business, activity, effort, or project consistent with the Authority’s purposes or necessary or convenient to exercise its powers;

Exercise, in addition to its other powers, all powers that are (i) granted to corporations by the provisions of Title 13.1 or similar provisions of any successor law, except in those cases in which the power is confined to corporations created under such title, and (ii) not inconsistent with the purposes and intent of this chapter or the limitations included in this chapter;

Accept, hold, and enjoy any gift, devise, or bequest to the Authority or its predecessors to be held for the uses and purposes designated by the donor, if any, or if not so designated, for the general purposes of the Authority, whether given directly or indirectly, and accept, execute, and administer any trust or endowment fund in which it has or may have an interest under the terms of the instrument creating the trust or endowment fund;

Borrow money and issue bonds as provided in this chapter and purchase such bonds;

Seek financing from, incur or assume indebtedness to, and enter into contractual commitments with the Virginia Public Building Authority and the Virginia College Building Authority, which authorities may borrow money and make and issue negotiable notes, bonds, and other evidences of indebtedness to provide such financing relating to the hospital facilities or any project;

Seek financing from, incur or assume indebtedness to, and enter into contractual commitments with the Commonwealth as otherwise provided by law relating to the hospital facilities or any project;

Procure such insurance, participate in such insurance plans, or provide such self-insurance as it deems necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter. The purchase of insurance, participation in an insurance plan, or creation of a self-insurance plan by the Authority is not a waiver or relinquishment of any sovereign immunity to which the Authority or its officers, directors, employees, or agents are otherwise entitled;

Develop policies and procedures generally applicable to the procurement of goods, services, and construction based upon competitive principles;

Except as to those hospital facilities or any part of such facilities that are leased to the Authority by the University, the control and disposition of which shall be determined by such lease instruments:

Own, hold, improve, use, and otherwise deal with real or personal property, tangible or intangible, or any right, easement, estate, or interest in such property, acquired by purchase, exchange, gift, assignment, transfer, foreclosure, lease, bequest, devise, operation of law, or other means on such terms and conditions and in such manner as it may deem proper;

Sell, assign, lease, encumber, mortgage, or otherwise dispose of any project, any other real or personal property, tangible or intangible, any right, easement, estate, or interest in such property, or any deed of trust or mortgage lien interest that it owns, that is under its control or custody or in its possession;

Release or relinquish any right, title, claim, lien, interest, easement, or demand however acquired, including any equity or right of redemption in property foreclosed by it; and

Take any action pursuant to subdivision 14 by public or private sale or with or without public bidding, notwithstanding the provisions of any other law;

The exercise of the powers permitted by this chapter shall be deemed the performance of essential governmental functions and matters of public necessity for the entire Commonwealth in the provision of health care, medical and health sciences education, and research for which public moneys may be borrowed, loaned, spent, or otherwise utilized and private property may be utilized or acquired.

15.

Accept loans, grants, contributions, or other assistance from the federal government, the Commonwealth, any political subdivision of the Commonwealth, or any other public or private source to carry out any of the purposes of this chapter and enter into any agreement or contract regarding the acceptance, use, or repayment of any such loan, grant, contribution, or assistance in furtherance of the purposes of this chapter;

16.

Exercise the power of eminent domain pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 2 (§

25.1-200

et seq.) of Title 25.1 to acquire by condemnation any real property, including fixtures and improvements, that it may deem necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter, upon (i) its adoption of a resolution declaring that the acquisition of such property is in the public interest and necessary for public use and (ii) the approval of the Governor. The Authority may acquire property already devoted to a public use, provided that no property belonging to any locality, religious corporation, unincorporated church, or charitable corporation may be acquired without its consent;

17.

Fix, revise, charge, and collect rates, rentals, fees, and other charges for the services or facilities furnished by or on behalf of the Authority and establish policies, procedures, and regulations regarding any such service rendered or the use, occupancy or operation of any such facility. Such charges and policies, procedures, and regulations are not subject to supervision or regulation by any commission, board, bureau, or agency of the Commonwealth except as otherwise provided by law for the providers of health care;

18.

Consistent with §

23.1-2407

, create, assist in the creation of, own in whole or in part, control, participate in or with any public or private entity, purchase, receive, subscribe for, own, hold, vote, use, employ, sell, mortgage, lend, pledge, or otherwise acquire or dispose of any (i) shares or obligations of, or other interests in, any entities organized for any purpose within or outside the Commonwealth and (ii) obligations of any person or corporation;

19.

Participate in joint ventures with individuals, corporations, governmental bodies or agencies, partnerships, associations, insurers, or other entities to facilitate any activities or programs consistent with the public purposes and intent of this chapter;

20.

Create a nonprofit entity for the purpose of soliciting, accepting, and administering grants, outright gifts and bequests, endowment gifts and bequests, and gifts and bequests in trust. Such entity shall not engage in trust business or duplicate such activities by the University or its related foundations;

21.

Provide appropriate assistance, including making loans and providing time of employees, to corporations, partnerships, associations, joint ventures, or other entities whether such entities are owned or controlled in whole or in part or directly or indirectly by the Authority;

22.

Provide, promote, support, and sponsor education and scientific research in medicine, public health, and related fields and promote public knowledge in medicine, public health, and related fields;

23.

Administer programs to assist in the delivery of medical and related services to the citizens of the Commonwealth and others;

24.

Participate in and administer federal, state, and local programs affecting, supporting, or carrying out any of its purposes; and

25.

Exercise independently the powers conferred by this chapter in furtherance of its corporate and public purposes.

History.

1996, cc. 905, 1046, §§ 23-50.16:2, 23-50.16:6, 23-50.16:11, 23-50.16:12, 23-50.16:13, 23-50.16:14; 2003, c. 940; 2006, c. 673; 2016, c. 588; 2017, c. 314.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2017, c. 314, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall be effective retroactively to October 1, 2016.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 314, effective retroactively to October 1, 2016, substituted “may borrow” for “are authorized to borrow” in subdivision A 10.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Sovereign immunity. —

Supreme Court likely would find VCU Health System Authority to be an arm of the Commonwealth and therefore entitled to absolute immunity. Even if the Court were not to agree, however, VCU Health System Authority also satisfies the criteria of a quasi-municipal corporation and therefore would be entitled to immunity for governmental functions. The Virginia Tort Claims Act exposes the Commonwealth, but not VCU Health System Authority, to limited liability for the negligent acts of its employees. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable James P. “Jimmie” Massie III, Member, Virginia House of Delegates, 17-005, 2017 Va. AG LEXIS 26 (12/7/17).

§ 23.1-2405.
Additional powers of the Authority; operation of projects.

The Authority may acquire, plan, design, construct, own, rent as landlord or tenant, operate, control, remove, renovate, enlarge, equip, and maintain, directly or through stock or nonstock corporations or other entities, any project as defined in this chapter. Such projects may be owned or operated by the Authority or other parties or jointly by the Authority and other parties and may be operated within or outside the Commonwealth, so long as (i) their operations are necessary or desirable to assist the Authority in carrying out its public purposes within the Commonwealth and (ii) any private benefit resulting to any such other private parties from any such project is merely incidental to the public benefit of the project.

In the operation of hospitals and other health care and related facilities, the Authority may make and enforce all policies, procedures, and regulations necessary or desirable for such operation, including those relating to the conditions under which the privilege of practicing may be available in such facilities, the admission and treatment of patients, the procedures for determining the qualification of patients for indigent care or other programs, and the protection of patients and employees, provided that such policies, procedures, and regulations do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or national origin.

History.

1996, cc. 905, 1046, § 23-50.16:9; 2016, c. 588; 2020, c. 1137.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1137 inserted “sexual orientation, gender identity” in subsection B.

§ 23.1-2406.
Additional powers of the Authority; police.

The Authority may adopt and enforce reasonable policies, procedures, and regulations governing (i) access to, conduct in or on, and use of its property and facilities and the surrounding streets, sidewalks, and other public areas and (ii) other matters affecting the safety and security of Authority property and individuals using or occupying Authority property. Such policies, procedures, and regulations have the force and effect of law (a) after publication one time in full in a newspaper of general circulation in the locality where the affected property is located and (b) when posted where the individuals using such property may conveniently see them.

The campus police department of the University, established in accordance with the provisions of Article 3 (§

23.1-809

et seq.) of Chapter 8, may enforce on Authority property the laws of the Commonwealth and policies and regulations adopted pursuant to subsection A. To the extent that such police services are not provided by the University, the Authority may establish a police department in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 8, except that the employment of such personnel by the Authority is not subject to the Virginia Personnel Act (§

2.2-2900

et seq.).

History.

1996, cc. 905, 1046, § 23-50.16:10; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2407.
Public purpose.

The exercise of the powers granted by this chapter is in all respects for the benefit of the inhabitants of the Commonwealth and the promotion of their safety, health, welfare, knowledge, convenience, and prosperity. No part of the assets or net earnings of the Authority shall inure to the benefit of or be distributable to any private individual, except that reasonable compensation may be paid for services rendered to or for the Authority affecting one or more of its purposes, and benefits may be conferred that are in conformity with its purposes. No private individual is entitled to share in the distribution of any of the corporate assets upon dissolution of the Authority.

History.

1996, cc. 905, 1046, § 23-50.16:15; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2408.
Moneys of the Authority.

All moneys of the Authority derived from any source shall be paid to the treasurer of the Authority. Such moneys shall be deposited in the first instance by the treasurer in one or more banks or trust companies, in one or more special accounts. All banks and trust companies may give security for such deposits, if required by the Authority. The moneys in such accounts shall be paid out on the warrant or other orders of the treasurer of the Authority or such other person as the Authority may authorize to execute such warrants or orders.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Authority may invest its operating funds in any obligations or securities that are considered legal investments for public funds in accordance with the Investment of Public Funds Act (§

2.2-4500

et seq.). The board shall adopt written investment guidelines and retain an independent investment advisory firm or consultant to review at least every five years the suitability of the Authority’s investments and the consistency of such investments with the investment guidelines.

History.

1996, cc. 905, 1046, § 23-50.16:14; 2016, c. 588; 2017, c. 314.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2017, c. 314, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall be effective retroactively to October 1, 2016.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 314, effective retroactively to October 1, 2016, substituted “may give” for “are authorized to give” in the third sentence of subsection A.

§ 23.1-2409.
Grants and loans from localities.

Localities may lend or donate money or other property to the Authority for any of the Authority’s purposes. The local governing body making the grant or loan may restrict the use of such grants or loans to a specific project within or outside that locality.

History.

1996, cc. 905, 1046, § 23-50.16:11; 2016, c. 588; 2017, c. 314.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2017, c. 314, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall be effective retroactively to October 1, 2016.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 314, effective retroactively to October 1, 2016, substituted “Localities may lend” for “Localities are authorized to lend” in the first sentence.

§ 23.1-2410.
Audit.

The Authority shall select through a process of competitive negotiation either (i) the Auditor of Public Accounts or his legally authorized representatives or (ii) a certified public accounting firm to annually audit the Authority’s accounts.

The Authority shall distribute copies of the annual audit to the Governor and the Chairmen of the House Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations.

The Auditor of Public Accounts and his legally authorized representatives may examine the accounts and books of the Authority; however, the Authority is not a state or governmental agency, advisory agency, public body or agency, or instrumentality for purposes of Chapter 14 (§ 30-130 et seq.) of Title 30.

The Authority is subject to periodic external review under the provisions of the Legislative Program Review and Evaluation Act (§ 30-65 et seq.).

History.

1996, cc. 905, 1046, § 23-50.16:8; 2016, c. 588.

Editor’s note.

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” for “Senate Committee on Finance.” March 10, 2021.

§ 23.1-2411.
Exemption from taxation.

The Authority is not required to pay any taxes or assessments upon any (i) project, property, or operations of the Authority or the income from such projects, property, or operations or (ii) project, property, or local obligation acquired or used by the Authority under the provisions of this chapter or the income from such projects, property, or local obligations. Such exemptions shall not extend to persons conducting businesses on the Authority’s property for which payment of state or local taxes would otherwise be required.

Any bonds issued by the Authority under the provisions of this chapter, the transfer of such bonds, and the income from such bonds and all rents, fees, charges, gifts, grants, revenues, receipts, and other moneys received or pledged to pay or secure the payment of such bonds are exempt from taxation and assessment of every kind by the Commonwealth and by the local governing bodies and other political subdivisions of the Commonwealth.

History.

1996, cc. 905, 1046, § 23-50.16:16; 2016, c. 588.